Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 70, article 20, section 2, subdivision 30, is amended to read: Subd. 30. Grant Programs; Child Mental Health Grants 44,487,000 deleted text begin 37,934,000 deleted text end new text begin 37,834,000 new text end (a) Psychiatric residential treatment facility start-up grants. $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 and deleted text begin $1,000,000deleted text end new text begin $900,000new text end in fiscal year 2025 are for psychiatric residential treatment facility start-up grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.0941, subdivision 5. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (b) African American Child Wellness Institute. $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is for a grant to the African American Child Wellness Institute to provide culturally specific mental health and substance use disorder services under Minnesota Statutes, section 245.0961. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (c) Base level adjustment. The general fund base is $34,648,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $34,648,000 in fiscal year 2027. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; REPORT.new text end new text begin (a) $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Direct Care and Treatment executive board for planning a build out of a locked psychiatric residential treatment facility operated by Direct Care and Treatment. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) By March 1, 2026, the executive board must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services finance and policy on the plan developed using the appropriation in this section to build out a locked psychiatric residential treatment facility (PRTF) operated by Direct Care and Treatment. new text end new text begin (c) The report must include but is not limited to the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the risks and benefits of locating the locked PRTF in a metropolitan or rural location; new text end new text begin (2) the estimated cost for the build out of the locked PRTF; new text end new text begin (3) the estimated ongoing cost of maintaining the locked PRTF; and new text end new text begin (4) the estimated amount of costs that can be recouped from medical assistance, MinnesotaCare, and private insurance payments. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end